Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-147
Agriculture and mechanic arts; acceptance of federal act.

Full and complete acceptance, ratification and assent is made and given by the State of Nebraska to all and every of the grants, purposes, terms and conditions set forth in an Act of the Congress of the United States, approved August 30, 1890, entitled An act to apply a portion of the proceeds of the public lands to the more complete endowment and support of the colleges for the benefit of agriculture and the mechanic arts, established under the provisions of an Act of Congress, approved July 2, 1862.

Laws 1891, c. 52, § 1, p. 358;

R.S.1913, § 7132;

C.S.1922, § 6764;

C.S.1929, § 85-150;

R.S.1943, § 85-147.